Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.604.020

Student personal information—Information about collection and use—Changes to privacy policies—Access to and correction of information—Application to education data center.

(1) School service providers shall provide clear and easy to understand information about the types of student personal information they collect and about how they use and share the student personal information.

(2) School service providers shall provide prominent notice before making material changes to their privacy policies for school services.

(3) School service providers shall facilitate access to and correction of student personal information by students or their parent or guardian either directly or through the relevant educational institution or teacher.

(4) Where the school service is offered to an educational institution or teacher, information required by subsections (1) and (2) of this section may be provided to the educational institution or teacher.

(5) The provisions of this section do not apply to the education data center established under RCW 43.41.400, but do apply to any subcontractors of the education data center.

[ 2015 c 277 s 3.]